Tennessee, session 114, HB1307.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3703(e), is amended by
deleting the language "October 1" and substituting instead "October15".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1307
000553
- 1 -